Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Article 1. Duties of School Districts

§ 570.
Harassment, hazing, and bullying prevention policies.

State policy. It is the policy of the State of Vermont that all Vermont educational institutions provide safe, orderly, civil, and positive learning environments. Harassment, hazing, and bullying have no place and will not be tolerated in Vermont schools. No Vermont student should feel threatened or be discriminated against while enrolled in a Vermont school.

Prevention policies. Each school board shall develop, adopt, ensure the enforcement of, and make available in the manner described under subdivision 563(1) of this title harassment, hazing, and bullying prevention policies that shall be at least as stringent as model policies developed by the Secretary. Any school board that fails to adopt one or more of these policies shall be presumed to have adopted the most current model policy or policies published by the Secretary.

Notice. Annually, prior to the commencement of curricular and cocurricular activities, the school board shall provide notice of the policy and procedures developed under this subchapter to students, custodial parents or guardians of students, and staff members, including reference to the consequences of misbehavior contained in the plan required by section 1161a of this title. Notice to students shall be in age-appropriate language and should include examples of harassment, hazing, and bullying. At a minimum, this notice shall appear in any publication that sets forth the comprehensive rules, procedures, and standards of conduct for the school. The school board shall use its discretion in developing and initiating age-appropriate programs to inform students about the substance of the policy and procedures in order to help prevent harassment, hazing, and bullying. School boards are encouraged to foster opportunities for conversations between and among students regarding tolerance and respect.

Duties of the Secretary. The Secretary shall:

develop and, from time to time, update model harassment, hazing, and bullying prevention policies; and

establish an Advisory Council to review and coordinate school and statewide activities relating to the prevention of and response to harassment, hazing, and bullying. The Council shall report annually in January to the State Board and the House and Senate Committees on Education. The Council shall include:

the Executive Director of the Vermont Principals’ Association or designee;

the Executive Director of the Vermont School Boards Association or designee;

the Executive Director of the Vermont Superintendents Association or designee;

the President of the Vermont-National Education Association or designee;

the Executive Director of the Vermont Human Rights Commission or designee;

the Executive Director of the Vermont Independent Schools Association or designee; and

other members selected by the Secretary, at least one of whom shall be a current secondary student who has witnessed or experienced harassment, hazing, or bullying in the school environment.

Definitions. In this subchapter:

“Educational institution” and “school” mean a public school or an approved or recognized independent school as defined in section 11 of this title.

“Organization,” “pledging,” and “student” have the same meanings as in section 570i of this title.

“Harassment,” “hazing,” and “bullying” have the same meanings as in subdivisions 11(a)(26), (30), and (32) of this title.

“School board” means the board of directors or other governing body of an educational institution when referring to an independent school.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. May 11, 2012; amended

2011, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 32;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 72.

§ 570a.
Harassment.

Policies and plan. The harassment prevention policy required by section 570 of this title and its plan for implementation shall include:

A statement that harassment, as defined in subdivision 11(a)(26) of this title, is prohibited and may constitute a violation of the public accommodations act as more fully described in article 2 of this subchapter 5.

Consequences and appropriate remedial action for staff or students who commit harassment. At all stages of the investigation and determination process, school officials are encouraged to make available to complainants alternative dispute resolution methods, such as mediation, for resolving complaints.

A procedure that directs students, staff, parents, and guardians how to report violations and file complaints.

A description of the circumstances under which harassment may be reported to a law enforcement agency.

A procedure for investigating reports of violations and complaints. The procedure shall provide that, unless special circumstances are present and documented by the school officials, an investigation is initiated no later than one school day from the filing of a complaint and the investigation and determination by school officials are concluded no later than five school days from the filing of the complaint with a person designated to receive complaints under subdivision (7) of this subsection. All internal reviews of the school’s initial determination, including the issuance of a final decision, shall, unless special circumstances are present and documented by the school officials, be completed within 30 days after the review is requested.

A description of how the school board will ensure that teachers and other staff members receive training in preventing, recognizing, and responding to harassment.

Annual designation of two or more people at each school campus to receive complaints and a procedure for publicizing those people’s availability.

A procedure for publicizing the availability of the Vermont Human Rights Commission and the federal Department of Education’s Office of Civil Rights and other appropriate State and federal agencies to receive complaints of harassment.

A statement that acts of retaliation for the reporting of harassment or for cooperating in an investigation of harassment are unlawful pursuant to

9 V.S.A. § 4503

.

Independent review.

A student who desires independent review under this subsection because the student is either dissatisfied with the final determination of the school officials as to whether harassment occurred or believes that, although a final determination was made that harassment occurred, the school’s response was inadequate to correct the problem shall make such request in writing to the headmaster or superintendent of schools. Upon such request, the headmaster or superintendent shall initiate an independent review by a neutral person selected from a list developed jointly by the Secretary of Education and the Human Rights Commission and maintained by the Secretary. Individuals shall be placed on the list on the basis of their objectivity, knowledge of harassment issues, and relevant experience.

The independent review shall proceed expeditiously and shall consist of an interview of the student and the relevant school officials and review of written materials involving the complaint maintained by the school or others.

Upon the conclusion of the review, the reviewer shall advise the student and the school officials as to the sufficiency of the school’s investigation, its determination, the steps taken by the school to correct any harassment found to have occurred, and any future steps the school should take. The reviewer shall advise the student of other remedies that may be available if the student remains dissatisfied and, if appropriate, may recommend mediation or other alternative dispute resolution.

The independent reviewer shall be considered an agent of the school for the purpose of being able to review confidential student records.

The costs of the independent review shall be borne by the public school district or independent school.

Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the school board from requesting an independent review at any stage of the process.

Evidence of conduct or statements made in connection with an independent review shall not be admissible in any court proceeding. This subdivision shall not require exclusion of any evidence otherwise obtainable from independent sources merely because it is presented in the course of an independent review.

The Secretary may adopt rules implementing this subsection.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. May 11, 2012; amended

2013, No. 34

, § 10;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 72, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 570b.
Hazing.

The hazing prevention policy required by section 570 of this title and its plan for implementation shall include:

a statement that hazing, as defined in subdivision 11(a)(30) of this title, is prohibited and may be subject to civil penalties pursuant to article 3 of this subchapter 5;

a procedure that directs students, staff, parents, and guardians how to report violations and file complaints;

a procedure for investigating reports of violations and complaints;

a description of the circumstances under which hazing may be reported to a law enforcement agency;

appropriate penalties or sanctions, or both, for organizations that or individuals who engage in hazing and revocation or suspension of an organization’s permission to operate or exist within the institution’s purview if that organization knowingly permits, authorizes, or condones hazing;

a description of how the school board will ensure that teachers and other staff members receive training in preventing, recognizing, and responding to hazing; and

annual designation of two or more people at each school campus to receive complaints and a procedure for publicizing those people’s availability.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. May 11, 2012; amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 72, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 570c.
Bullying.

The bullying prevention policy required by section 570 of this title and its plan for implementation shall include:

a statement that bullying, as defined in subdivision 11(a)(32) of this title, is prohibited;

a procedure that directs students, staff, parents, and guardians how to report violations and file complaints;

a procedure for investigating reports of violations and complaints;

a description of the circumstances under which bullying may be reported to a law enforcement agency;

consequences and appropriate remedial action for students who commit bullying;

a description of how the school board will ensure that teachers and other staff members receive training in preventing, recognizing, and responding to bullying; and

annual designation of two or more people at each school campus to receive complaints and a procedure both for publicizing the availability of those people and clarifying that their designation does not preclude a student from bringing a complaint to any adult in the building.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. May 11, 2012.

§§ 570d,
570e.
[Reserved for future use.]